Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 15 Capital Construction Projects
§ 21-15-120.
Emergency facility needs.

The commission shall promulgate rules under which an emergency shall be determined to exist with respect to the adequacy of the school buildings and facilities of any school district such that the ability of the district to provide educational programs required by law is immediately and substantially impacted and no reasonable alternative exists to address it other than emergency funding under this section.

Upon a finding that an emergency exists under subsection (a) of this section, the commission shall in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the commission under this subsection and to the extent funds are available within the school capital construction account or otherwise made available by the legislature, acquire facilities and equipment, undertake school building and facility repairs, fund additional operating expenses incurred in providing temporary measures and other responses to the emergency situation including necessary investigative and qualified contract assistance expenses incurred by the commission, as necessary to enable the district to provide educational programs required by law on a temporary basis until permanent action can be taken to address school building and facility adequacy.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 1; 2008, ch. 93, § 1; 2018 ch. 36, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (b), substituted “and to the extent funds are available within the school capital construction account or otherwise made available by the legislature, acquire facilities and equipment, undertake facility repairs, fund” for “make expenditures from the emergency contingency account within the school capital construction account for emergency funding. Expenditures from the contingency account pursuant to this subsection shall be limited to the acquisition or use of facilities, the acquisition of equipment, facility repairs”, and made stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), substituted “equipment, undertake school building and facility repairs” for “equipment, undertake facility repairs” near the middle of the subsection and “address school building and facility adequacy” for “address building adequacy” at the end.

§ 21-15-121.
Annual school building status report to select committee on school facilities.

Not later than September 1 of each year, the commission shall submit a report to the select committee on school facilities on progress being made under the school capital facilities system established under this act. The report shall be incorporated into the proposed budget submitted to the select committee under W.S.

21-15-119

and shall include:

Building and facility needs determined under W.S.

21-15-117

, identifying progress made in the year reported;

Building and facility needs addressed under this act or otherwise by districts including any building or facility which is closed or otherwise removed from operation during that year, and relating this paragraph to progress made in building and facility condition under paragraph (i) of this subsection;

Use of major building and facility repair and replacement funds which have addressed buildings and facilities identified under W.S.

21-15-117

(a), including the impact of expenditures of these funds, as quantified pursuant to any needs assessment under W.S. 21-15-117(a), on building condition as reported under paragraph (i) of this subsection and on the capacity, educational suitability and technology readiness of these buildings and facilities;

Amounts of funds expended to address building and facility needs for the period of time addressed in the report together with historical amounts;

The impact of expenditures on the building and facility scores for condition, educational suitability and technology readiness, including computed building capacity;

and (vii) Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 93, § 2.

Any expenditures for emergency school building and facility needs under W.S.

21-15-120

.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 1; 2008, ch. 93, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 207, § 1; 2018 ch. 36, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 131, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote (a)(i) through (a)(iv) clarifying commission reporting process, repealed former (a)(vi) which read: “Additional buildings and facilities identified as inadequate under this section for the current year and a comparison of these current year identified needs with the needs addressed during the preceding year”; repealed former (a)(vii) which read: “A cross referencing of additional building and facilities identified as inadequate under paragraph (a)(vi) of this section and district responses to the inadequacies as provided with the district facility plans submitted under W.S.

21-15-116

”; substituted “facility needs” for “funding” in (a)(viii), and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the introductory paragraph of (a), substituted “September 1” for “December 1” in the first sentence and inserted “shall be incorporated into the proposed budget submitted to the select committee under W.S. 21 15 119 and” in the introductory clause.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(viii), inserted “school building and” following “emergency.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "21-15-117" for "21-15-115" in (a)(i); in (a)(iii), substituted "21-15-117(a)" for "21-15-115," "any" for "the statewide" and "under W.S.

21-15-117

(a)" for "rating scores undertaken in accordance with W.S. 21 15 115."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-15-111(a)(viii).

Legislative intent. —

Legislature required that the Wyoming School Facilities Commission (SFC) to establish and maintain uniform statewide standards for the adequacy of school buildings and facilities and that the SFC make an annual report regarding all aspects of the school facilities needs, including buildings deemed inadequate, expenditures, progress, and upcoming budgetary needs; under the statutory scheme, the legislature provided for capital construction funding from state wealth without reliance upon local wealth as a source of capital, mandated that facilities be remedied to a point requiring only routine maintenance, and made adequacy of the facilities a function of delivering adequate education programs. The legislature has acted to increase the speed of repair or replacement and continues to appropriate large sums; that continued aggressive legislative oversight over capital construction was obtaining results as part of a constitutional statutory scheme to eliminate wealth-based disparities in the state school system.
Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 2008 WY 2, 181 P.3d 43,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2008).

§ 21-15-122.
School capital construction fund; transfers to the common school permanent land fund. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 98, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 205, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 21-15-123.
State construction department; duties and authority relating to school facilities.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 105, § 4.

The director of the state construction department or his designee shall review and evaluate school district requests for the alteration of grade configurations pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(vi), and shall evaluate the request in the best financial and educational interests of the state, taking into consideration the most efficient and cost effective approach in order to deliver quality educational services.

The state construction department shall:

Implement policies, guidelines and standards as adopted by the commission for school district facility plans required under W.S.

21-15-116

;

Subject to W.S. 21-15-117(a)(iii), establish a consistent, systematic research approach for student enrollment projections used by districts in developing district facility plans and forecasting building and facility needs to comply with statewide building adequacy standards;

Develop cost per square foot guidelines to be used in estimating the cost of constructing, renovating and otherwise remediating buildings and facilities to comply with statewide adequacy standards, which shall account for demonstrated differences among regions and communities within the state;

Establish a statewide school facilities database comprised of building and facility specific condition, suitability, accessibility, capacity, inventory and site data;

Enter into or approve construction or renovation project agreements with school districts, as appropriate. Each agreement shall:

Require the district to make arrangements for appropriate professional supervision and management of the project;

Provide for the review and approval by the department of project plans and specifications;

Provide for review and approval by the department of project changes and change orders provided that:

The agreement may specify parameters identifying the circumstances under which changes and change orders may also be approved;

All changes and change orders shall be approved by the district or its representative.

Establish payment schedules involving state funds;

Assure the state is not responsible or liable for compliance with construction or renovation project schedules or completion dates;

Provide that the agreement shall expire upon completion of the project or projects;

Contain any other provision mutually agreed upon by the department and the district;

Allow for alternate design and construction delivery methods as defined in W.S.

16-6-701

for provision of design and construction services, if approved by the commission; and

Require a contract compliance audit by independent auditing expertise of project budgets and expenditures prior to completing the project or projects.

Review district proposals for the disposition or demolition of buildings and facilities made surplus by an approved construction or renovation project or by changes in school population, including allocation of resulting costs and revenues and report the proposals to the commission. Disposition shall include options for use, lease, sale and any other means of disposing of the surplus building or facility. The costs and revenues incurred by the disposition or demolition of the building or facility shall be accounted for in each district’s school facility plan and considered in any building or facility remedy for that district, including the allocation of revenues resulting from the disposition of property rendered surplus to offset property demolition costs. The department shall report this review to the commission. The commission, after receiving a report of the review by the department, shall approve the proposal related to disposition or demolition submitted pursuant to this paragraph unless the commission determines that the proposal does not protect the financial interests of the state or is not otherwise in the public interest. Any revenues resulting from property disposition under this paragraph shall not be considered or counted under W.S. 21-13-310(a)(xiv) or (xv);

Authorize, subject to commission review, the purchase and acquisition of sites for any project within the approved district facility plan if state funds are to be expended for the acquisition;

Review any proposed sale of existing land owned by a district, which land is within the scope of the district’s facility plan, and determine the impact of the land disposition upon that plan. The department shall report the review to the commission. The commission, after receiving a report of the review by the department, shall approve the proposal related to a sale submitted pursuant to this paragraph unless the commission determines that the proposal does not protect the financial interests of the state or is not otherwise in the public interest. If the commission determines land disposition adversely impacts the cost–effectiveness of the district’s facility plan, the revenues resulting from land disposition shall be considered by the commission in any future building or facility remedy for that district and, notwithstanding paragraph (vi) of this subsection, the commission may direct the department of education to consider or count those revenues under either W.S. 21-13-310(a)(xiv) or (xv).

The department may contract with appropriate expertise and professionals, including auditors, in administering this act and performing duties imposed under this act.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 2, § 1; 2012, ch. 99, § 1; 2013 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 105, §§ 3, 4, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 36, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012,
added the last sentence in (e).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “Subject to W.S. 21-15-117(a)(iii),” making a related change in (f)(ii).

The 2016 amendments.

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 105 § 3, effective July 1, 2016, in (e), deleted the former first sentence, which read, “The director is the chief administrative officer of the department with general supervision and control of all activities, functions and employees of the department, under the direction and supervision of the commission. He shall devote his entire time to the performance and supervision of the duties conferred on him by the commission and by law,” and in the present first sentence inserted “of the state construction department or his designee” following “director” and deleted “also” preceding “review”; and in (f), substituted “state construction” for “school facilities.”

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 105 § 4, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (a) through (d), which read:
“(a) The school facilities department is created. “(b) The department is under the direction and supervision of the school facilities commission. The department shall perform all duties required pursuant to this act and any duties as designated by the commission. “(c) The department consists of the director who is the chief administrative officer and other personnel as approved by the governor. “(d) The governor shall appoint a competent person as the director of the department who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed by him as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The director's salary shall be determined by the governor. Any appointment under this subsection shall be with the advice and consent of the senate.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “proposals” for “plans” or similar language throughout the section; in (f)(v)(H), inserted “if approved by the commission” following “construction services”; in (f)(vi), deleted “The district shall have final authority over the disposition or demolition of any surplus buildings or facilities, except that” from the beginning of the fifth sentence, substituted “department, shall approve the proposal related” for “department, may disapprove any plans related,” and “pursuant to this paragraph unless the commission” for “pursuant to this paragraph if the commission” near the middle of the fifth sentence; in (f)(viii), deleted “The district shall have final authority over the sale of existing land owned by the district, except that” at the beginning of the third sentence and substituted “department, shall approve the proposal related” for “department, may disapprove any plans related” near the middle of the third sentence; and made stylistic changes.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 2, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.